Louisiana, session 2026, SB234.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3384 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3384. Medical school grading scale
A. Beginning August 1, 2027, all public postsecondary education
institutions offering medical doctorate degrees shall adopt policies ensuring that
all curriculum coursework offered for a medical degree or certificate assesses
a student's performance on the assigned coursework using a tiered grading
system of High-Pass (HP), Pass (P), Low-Pass(LP), or Fail (F), or another tiered
grading system with at least four such designations.
B. If any provision of this Section or the application thereof is held
invalid as to any person or circumstance, such invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this Section which can be given effect without the
invalid provisions or applications.
Section 2. This Act shall be known as the "Medical School Letter Grade Act".
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 234 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026. If vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.